Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.160

Suspension for nonpayment of fees.

Any member failing to pay any fees after the same become due, and after two months' written notice of his or her delinquency, must be suspended from membership in the state bar, but may be reinstated upon payment of accrued fees and such penalties as may be imposed by the board of governors, not exceeding double the amount of the delinquent fee.

[ 2011 c 336 s 66; 1933 c 94 s 12; RRS s 138-12.]